Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COMMUNITY HEALTH STUDY ON LEAD EXPOSURE IN DAKOTA COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for a grant to the Dakota County board for Dakota County Public Health to conduct a community health study on lead exposure among Dakota County residents. The study may: new text end new text begin (1) examine sources of lead emissions in Dakota County and whether lead emissions from any sources have exceeded air quality standards or water quality standards for lead at any point in the previous 24 months; new text end new text begin (2) examine any impacts of elevated lead emissions in the county on blood lead levels of county residents, particularly on the blood lead levels of children under age six, pregnant women, and individuals residing within one mile of a source of lead emissions that exceeded air quality standards for lead in the previous 24 months; and new text end new text begin (3) identify necessary steps at the county and state levels to protect county residents from exposure to elevated lead emissions and to mitigate risks of elevated lead emissions for county residents. new text end new text begin (b) At the request of Dakota County Public Health, the commissioner may provide technical assistance for the study and must make available de-identified data on Dakota County residents from the blood lead surveillance system under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.9502. new text end